Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; state department of corrections; department of juvenile corrections; department of public safety; administrative office of the courts; salary increases A. The sum of $_________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state department of corrections for a salary increase of fourteen percent for correctional officers employed by the department. B. The sum of $_________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state department of corrections for a salary increase of fourteen percent for investigators employed by the department. C. The sum of $_________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of juvenile corrections for a salary increase of fourteen percent for correctional officers employed by the department. D. The sum of $_________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for a salary increase of ten percent for all employees of the department. E. The sum of $_________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the administrative office of the courts for a salary increase of fifteen percent for all state-funded probation officers and staff.